Utah statutes.
17-12-2.   Bond elections -- Consolidating voting districts and precincts --
Voting places.
The county legislative body may in any bond election consolidate voting
districts and precincts and may select for the purposes of such election any
voting places which it considers desirable, without regard to regularly
established voting precincts and the voting places therefor.
